Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB97.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3102(b) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3102. Legislative findings and intent.* * *(a.1) Companion animals.--The Commonwealth recognizes that companion animals are living beings that are generally regarded as cherished family members that offer their owners companionship, security and assistance. Companion animals occupy a special category of personal property which does not include inanimate personal property. Therefore, it is the policy of the Commonwealth that special consideration be extended to companion 1234567891011121314151617181920 animals when the division of personal property is planned or determined under this part.(b) Construction of part.--The objectives and policies set forth in [subsection (a)] subsections (a) and (a.1) shall be considered in construing provisions of this part and shall be regarded as expressing the legislative intent.Section 2. Section 3103 of Title 23 is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 3103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Companion animal." As follows:(1) An animal that:(i) is a domesticated, living being commonly referred to as a pet; or(ii) has been bought, bred, raised or otherwise acquired in accordance with applicable law for the primary purpose of providing the owner with assistance in relation to a disability, security or companionship, rather than for business or agricultural purposes.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an animal that is used for business or agricultural purposes, but that has not been incorporated into the family household as a pet, may be considered as a companion animal, as determined by the court.* * *Section 3. Sections 3105 and 3502 of Title 23 are amended by adding subsections to read:§ 3105. Effect of agreement between parties.20250HB0097PN0080 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(d) Possession and care of companion animal.--Parties may enter into an enforceable agreement regarding the possession or care, or both, of a companion animal. Among other things, the agreement may specify the following:(1) The periods of time during which each party will possess the companion animal.(2) The financial responsibility of each party regarding the care of the companion animal.§ 3502. Equitable division of marital property.* * *(g) Companion animal.--(1) Upon the request of either party, the court shall provide for the possession or care, or both, of a companion animal of the parties in accordance with this subsection.(2) If the companion animal is a service animal, as that term is defined in section 2 of the act of October 24, 2018 (P.L.733, No.118), known as the Assistance and Service Animal Integrity Act, for a party or for an individual who is under 18 years of age and in the custody of that party, there shall be a rebuttable presumption of custody of the companion animal to that party.(3) If paragraph (2) does not apply, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including the following:(i) W hether the companion animal was acquired prior to or during the marriage.(ii) The basic daily needs of the companion animal.(iii) The party who generally facilitates veterinary care for the companion animal.(iv) The party who generally provides the companion 20250HB0097PN0080 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 animal with social interaction.(v) The party who generally ensures compliance with State and local regulations regarding the companion animal.(vi) The party who provides the greater ability to financially support the companion animal.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0097PN0080 - 4 - 1234567